Utah statutes.
16-6a-715.   Action by single and multiple voting groups.

(1)  If this chapter or the bylaws provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in Section 16-6a-714.

(2) (a)  If this chapter or the bylaws provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in Section 16-6a-714.

(b)  One voting group may vote on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

